Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,111
Regional housing agency; dissolution; procedure.

A regional housing agency desiring to dissolve may do so in the same manner as provided in sections 71-15,108 and 71-15,109, except that consent of all participating cities and counties shall be required and the transfer of property and assets of the regional housing agency upon dissolution may be effected either to a single transferee or to multiple transferees, as the agency shall determine, subject to approval by the participating political subdivisions.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 40.